Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB206.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 302(a), 323, 330(a) and 330.1(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 302. Imposition of Tax.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (c), every resident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that resident 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 during that resident's taxable year at the rate of three and seven hundredths per cent[.] until December 31, 2025. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, no tax may be imposed under this article.* * *Section 323. When Withholding Not Required.--Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, an employer on and after January 1, [1975] 2026, shall not be required to withhold any tax upon payment of wages to an employe. [if such employe can certify:(1) that he incurred no personal income tax liability for the preceding tax year; and(2) that he anticipates no liability for personal income tax for the current taxable year.]Section 330. Returns and Liability.--(a) [On] (1) Subject to clause (2), on or before the date when the taxpayer's Federal income tax return is due or would be due if the taxpayer were required to file a Federal income tax return, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, a tax return under this article shall be made and filed by or for every taxpayer having income for the taxable year.(2) This section shall not apply to taxable years beginning on or after December 31, 2025.* * *Section 330.1. Return of Pennsylvania S Corporation.--(a) [Every] (1) Subject to clause (2), every Pennsylvania S corporation shall make a return for each taxable year, stating specifically all items of gross income and deductions, the names and addresses of all persons owning stock in the corporation at any time during the taxable year, the number of shares of stock 20250SB0206PN0153 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owned by each shareholder at all times during the taxable year, the amount of money and other property distributed by the corporation during the taxable year to each shareholder, the date of each distribution, each shareholder's pro rata share of each item of the corporation for the taxable year and such other information as the department may require.(2) This section shall not apply to taxable years beginning on or after December 31, 2025.* * *Section 2. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 3. All regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0206PN0153 - 3 - 1234567891011121314